Utah, session 2026, SB163.
Section 1. Section 10-3-928 is amended to read:10-3-928. Attorney duties -- Deputy attorneys.In cities with a city attorney, the city attorney:(1)may prosecute violations of city ordinances;(2)may prosecute, under state law, infractions and misdemeanors occurring within the boundaries of the municipality;(3)has the same powers in respect to violations as are exercised by a county attorney or district attorney, except that a city attorney's authority to grant immunity shall be limited to:(a)granting transactional immunity for violations of city ordinances; and(b)granting transactional immunity under state law for infractions and misdemeanors occurring within the boundaries of the municipality;(4)shall represent the interests of the state or the municipality in the appeal of any matter prosecuted in any trial court by the city attorney;(5)may cooperate with the Office of the Attorney General during investigations; and(6)may designate a city attorney from another municipality or a public prosecutor to prosecute a matter, in the court having jurisdiction over the matter, if the city attorney has a conflict of interest regarding the matter being prosecuted.;(7)may employ a deputy attorney to perform the duties of public prosecutor or civil counsel; and(8)may specially deputize, for a limited time or limited purpose, an attorney licensed to practice law in the state and in good standing with the Utah State Bar as a deputy to assist in any public prosecutor or civil counsel duties specified in the special deputization.

Section 2:
Section 2.  Effective Date.This bill takes effect on May 6, 2026.